Florida, session 2026, HB5401.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) The Mediation and Arbitration Trust Fund
within the State Courts System, FLAIR number 22-2-213, is
terminated.
(2) All current balances remaining in, and all revenues
of, the trust fund shall be transferred to the State Courts
Revenue Trust Fund.
(3) The State Courts Revenue Trust Fund shall be used to
pay any outstanding debts or obligations of the terminated fund
as soon as practicable, and the Chief Financial Officer shall
close out and remove the trust fund from the various state
accounting and financial systems, using generally accepted
accounting principles concerning assets, liabilities, and
warrants outstanding.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5401 -00-er